Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 11

Voluntary Corporate Changes

45-3-1101. Amendment of charters.

Every association may amend its charter in the manner set forth herein. Each proposed amendment, together with a certified copy of the authorizing resolution, shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval. If the commissioner finds that the proposed amendment is in conformity with the law, the commissioner shall, in writing, approve the amendment and shall send notice of approval of the amendment by registered or certified mail to the home office of the association not less than thirty (30) days after its receipt by the commissioner. Should the commissioner disapprove any amendment within the time specified, the commissioner shall state the disapproval, together with the written reasons therefor, and send the same by registered or certified mail to the home office of the association, giving the association, if appropriate under the circumstances, the opportunity to modify or change and resubmit the proposed amendment so as to obviate the commissioner's objections. In the event that the commissioner disapproves the amendment after the resubmission by the association, the commissioner shall send written notice of the final disapproval by registered or certified mail to the home office of the association. Failure to send notice of approval or disapproval within the time specified shall be deemed to constitute approval of the proposed amendment by the commissioner.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.09; T.C.A., § 45-1609.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Conversion of financial institutions, title 45, ch. 11.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-3-1102. Merger and consolidation.

Merger. Any two (2) or more associations may merge into one (1) of the associations in the manner set forth herein. The board of directors of each association shall, by resolution adopted by a majority of the existing members of each board, approve a plan of merger setting forth:

The names and locations of the home offices of the associations proposing to merge, and the name and location of the home office of the association into which they propose to merge, which is designated as the surviving association;

The names and addresses of each director and officer of the surviving association;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger and the mode of carrying it into effect;

The manner and basis of converting the deposit accounts of each merging association into deposit accounts of the surviving association;

In the case of capital stock associations, the manner and basis of converting shares of stock of each merging association into shares of stock of the surviving association;

A statement of any changes in the charter or bylaws of the surviving association to be effected by the merger;

A statement in the form that the commissioner requires, that the surviving association has received a firm commitment for the insurance of deposit accounts by an insurer qualified under this chapter and that no lapse in the insurance of deposit accounts of each merging association shall at any time occur;

A statement that the plan of merger is subject to approval by the commissioner and by the stockholders or members of each merging association;

Provisions for terminating any activities and disposing of any assets that do not conform to the requirements of the surviving association; and

Other provisions with respect to the proposed merger that are deemed necessary or desirable by the boards of directors of the merging associations, and that the commissioner by rule or regulation requires to effect the purposes of this chapter.

Consolidation. Any two (2) or more associations may consolidate into a new association in the manner set forth herein. The board of directors of each association shall, by resolution adopted by the majority of the existing members of each board, approve a plan of consolidation setting forth:

The names and locations of the home offices of the associations proposing to consolidate and the name and location of the home office of the association into which they propose to consolidate, which is designated as the new association;

The names and addresses of each director and officer of the new association;

The terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation and the mode of carrying it into effect;

The manner and basis of converting the deposit accounts of each association into deposit accounts of the new association;

In the case of capital stock associations, the manner and basis of converting shares of stock of each association into shares of stock of the new association;

With respect to the new association, all of the provisions required to be set forth in the charter and bylaws of an association organized under this chapter;

A statement in the form that the commissioner requires, that the new association has received a firm commitment for the insurance of deposit accounts by an insurer qualified under this chapter and that no lapse in the insurance of deposit accounts of each association proposing to consolidate shall at any time occur;

A statement that the plan of consolidation is subject to approval by the commissioner and by the stockholders or members of each consolidating association;

When the merger involves a bank, provisions for terminating any activities and disposing of any assets that do not conform to the requirements of the surviving association; and

Other provisions with respect to the proposed consolidation that are deemed necessary or desirable by the boards of directors of the consolidating associations, and that the commissioner by rule or regulation requires to effect the purposes of this chapter.

Approval by Commissioner.

After approval by the board of directors of each merging or consolidating association, the plan of merger or consolidation shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval, together with certified copies of the authorizing resolutions of each board of directors showing approval by a majority of the existing board.

The commissioner shall approve the plan of merger or consolidation if it appears that:

The surviving or new association meets the requirements of this chapter as to the formation of an association;

The plan of merger or consolidation provides an adequate capital structure in relation to deposit liabilities of the surviving or new association;

The plan is fair and equitable;

The merger or consolidation is not contrary to the public interest; and

When the merger or consolidation involves a bank, the schedule for termination of any nonconforming activities and disposition of any nonconforming assets is timely, and the plan for termination and disposition does not include any unsafe and unsound practices.

Approval by the commissioner shall be in writing, and notice of approval shall be sent by certified mail to the home offices of the merging associations.

If the commissioner disapproves a plan of merger or consolidation, the commissioner shall send the commissioner's objections in writing by certified mail to the home offices of the merging or consolidating associations and give an opportunity to the merging or consolidating associations to amend and resubmit the plan so as to obviate the objections. In the event that the commissioner disapproves the plan after resubmission, the commissioner shall send written notice of the final disapproval by certified mail to the home offices of the merging or consolidating associations.

Approval by Stockholders or Members. Upon receipt of approval by the commissioner of the plan of merger or consolidation, the plan shall be submitted to a vote at an annual or special meeting of stockholders or members. The plan of merger or consolidation shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote, in person or by proxy, of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding voting stock or votes of members of each of the associations.

Procedure After Approval.

Upon approval, articles of merger or consolidation shall be prepared and executed, and shall set forth:

The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation;

As to each association, the number of votes present at the meeting in person or by proxy; and

As to each association, the number of votes for and against the plan, respectively.

The articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be filed with the secretary of state in accordance with law, and a certified copy shall be filed with the commissioner. Upon filing by the secretary of state, the merger or consolidation shall be effective.

Banks. Subject to the provision set forth in this section, a state or national bank may merge or consolidate with an association so that the surviving institution is an association. If the association is a federal association, the action to be taken by the merging or consolidating financial institution shall be the same as those prescribed for federal associations at the time of the action by the laws of the United States and not by the laws of this state, except that a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of each class of voting stock of a state bank shall be required for a merger or consolidation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.10; T.C.A., § 45-1610; Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 8.

45-3-1103. Sale of assets.

An association, in one (1) transaction not in the ordinary course of its business, may sell all or substantially all of its assets, with or without its name and good will, to another association or to a federal association, in consideration of money, stock, or obligations of the purchasing association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.11; T.C.A., § 45-1611.

45-3-1104. Procedure to effect sale of assets.

The procedure to effect a sale of all or substantially all of the assets of an association shall be as follows:

Resolution by Board of Directors. The board of directors shall, by resolution adopted by a majority of the existing members of the board, approve the sale and set forth in the resolution the terms and conditions of the sale;

Approval by Commissioner. The resolution approving and setting forth the terms of the proposed sale shall be submitted to the commissioner for the commissioner's approval and shall be supplemented by additional information that the commissioner may require. If the commissioner finds that the proposed sale is fair to all depositors, other creditors, and stockholders or members of the association and to any other persons concerned, and that provision has been made for the disposition of the remaining assets, if any, of the association as provided in this chapter for voluntary liquidation, then the commissioner shall, in writing, approve the sale and shall send notice of approval by certified mail to the home office of the association not less than thirty (30) days after its receipt by the commissioner. Should the commissioner disapprove all or any part of the sale, the commissioner shall state the disapproval, together with the written objections therefor, and send the same by certified mail to the home office of the association, giving an opportunity to the association to amend the terms or conditions of the sale and resubmit the resolution so as to obviate the objections. In the event that the commissioner disapproves the proposed sale after the resubmission, the commissioner shall send written notice of the final disapproval by certified mail to the home office of the association. Failure to send notice of approval or disapproval within the time specified shall be deemed to constitute approval of the proposed sale by the commissioner; and

Approval by Stockholders or Members. Upon approval of the proposed sale by the commissioner, the same shall be submitted to a vote at any annual or special meeting of the stockholders or members. The proposed sale shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote, in person or by proxy, of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding voting stock or votes of members. A proposal for the voluntary liquidation of the association shall be submitted to the stockholders at the same meeting or at any adjournment thereof, or at any later meeting called for that purpose in accordance with this chapter concerning voluntary liquidation. A certified report of the proceedings setting forth the terms of the proposed sale, the number of votes present in person or by proxy and the number of votes for and against any proposal, respectively, shall be filed with the commissioner.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.12; T.C.A., § 45-1612.

45-3-1105. Conversion of state mutual or federal association to state capital stock association.

Any state mutual association or any federal association, if otherwise permitted by federal law and regulations, may become a capital stock association operating under this chapter by following the procedures set forth as follows:

Approval by Board of Directors. The board of directors of the state mutual association or federal association shall approve a plan of conversion by resolution adopted by a majority vote of the existing members of the board;

Approval by Commissioner. Upon approval of the plan of conversion by the board of directors, the plan and the resolution approving it shall be submitted to the commissioner. If the commissioner, after appropriate examination, finds that the converting association complies sufficiently with the requirements of this chapter to entitle it to become a capital stock association operating under this chapter, and if the commissioner finds that the plan of conversion is fair and equitable and that the interests of the association and the public are adequately protected, the commissioner shall approve the plan of conversion. However, the commissioner may prescribe terms and conditions, to be fulfilled either prior to or after the conversion, to cause the association to conform with the requirements of this chapter. If the commissioner disapproves the plan of conversion, the commissioner shall state the commissioner's objections in writing and send the same by certified mail to the home office of the converting association, and afford the association an opportunity to amend and resubmit the plan so as to obviate the objections. In the event that the commissioner disapproves the plan after the resubmission, the commissioner shall send written notice of the final disapproval by certified mail to the home office of the association;

Submission to Members. After receipt of the commissioner's approval, the plan of conversion shall be submitted to an annual or special meeting of the members of the converting state mutual association or federal association. The plan of conversion shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote, in person or by proxy, of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding votes of members. Thereupon, action shall be taken to adopt a charter and bylaws, to elect directors and officers and take other action as is prescribed for a capital stock association under this chapter and by rules and regulations of the commissioner. A certified report of the proceedings at the meeting shall be filed promptly with the commissioner; and

Certificate of Conversion. If the commissioner finds that the proceedings have been in accordance with this section, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of conversion, attaching, as a part of this certificate, a copy of the charter and the report of proceedings filed pursuant to subdivision (3), and the commissioner shall forward the requisite number of copies of the materials to the secretary of state, who shall, when all required procedures have been met and taxes or fees have been paid, file the same. The conversion shall become effective upon the filing of the charter and other materials by the secretary of state in accordance with law.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.13; T.C.A., § 45-1613.

45-3-1106. Conversion of state capital stock association or federal association to state mutual association.

Any state capital stock association or any federal association, if otherwise permitted by federal law and regulations, may become a state mutual association by following the procedures set forth in §45-3-1105 and any rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.14; T.C.A., § 45-1614.

45-3-1107. Conversion from state to federal association.

Any association subject to this chapter may become a federal association pursuant to the laws and regulations of the United States and in accordance with the following procedure:

Approval by Board of Directors. The board of directors of the state association shall approve a plan of conversion by resolutions adopted by majority vote of the existing members of the board;

Approval by Commissioner. The plan of conversion shall not be submitted to the stockholders or members until approved in writing by the commissioner. The commissioner shall approve or disapprove the plan subject to the same requirements and in the same manner as is provided by § 45-3-1105 and any rules or regulations of the commissioner;

Submission to Stockholders or Members. In the event the commissioner does approve the plan of conversion, the plan shall be submitted to an annual or special meeting of the stockholders or members. The plan of conversion shall be approved upon receiving the affirmative vote, in person or by proxy, of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding voting stock or votes of members. A certified report of the proceedings of the meeting shall be filed promptly with the commissioner; and

Further Action. Within three (3) months after the date of the meeting, the association shall take further action, in the manner prescribed and authorized by the laws and regulations of the United States, that makes it a federal association. Three (3) copies of the charter issued by the federal home loan bank or three (3) copies of a certificate showing the organization of the association as a federal association certified by the secretary or an assistant secretary of the federal home loan bank board shall be filed with the commissioner. A failure to file the documents with the commissioner shall not affect the validity of the conversion. Upon the grant to any association of a charter by the federal home loan bank board, the association shall no longer be subject to the supervision and control of the commissioner as provided by this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.15; T.C.A., § 45-1615.

45-3-1108. Plan of conversion — Mandatory and permissive requirements.

Mandatory Provisions. The plan of conversion shall provide as follows:

Each depositor shall receive a deposit account in the converted association equal in amount to the depositor's account in the converting association; provided, that if the conversion contemplates a purchase of capital stock by deposit account holders in the converting association, then the plan may provide that all or a proportionate part of each deposit account, if the deposit account holder so elects, shall be credited or otherwise applied to the purchase of stock in the capital stock association;

In the event of a conversion from a state mutual association or federal association to a state capital stock association, no capital stock shall be issued to any deposit account holder free of charge, and each deposit account holder shall be entitled to receive rights to purchase the capital stock;

In the event of a conversion from a state capital stock association to a state mutual association or federal association, the plan of conversion shall show how the rights of the stockholders to a return of capital shall be effected;

The plan of conversion shall show with particularity the business purpose to be accomplished by the conversion; and

The plan of conversion shall contain other information and be in the form required by the commissioner to enable the commissioner to determine whether the plan is fair and equitable and that the interests of deposit account holders, creditors, stockholders, or members and the public are adequately protected.

Permissive Provisions. A plan of conversion shall not be considered unfair or inequitable merely because it contains provisions that provide that:

Deposit account holders shall have a right to purchase shares of capital stock at the fair market value thereof;

Deposit account holders shall or shall not have preemptive rights to all stock proposed to be issued;

Stockholders shall have the option of accepting a redemption of their shares of stock in return for cash or other property or that the value of the shares of stock may be converted into one (1) or more deposit accounts in the name of the stockholder;

Employment contracts are provided for officers and employees of the converted association; or

Not more than fifteen percent (15%) of the capital stock proposed to be issued pursuant to the plan of conversion is reserved by the association for stock options for officers and employees.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.16; T.C.A., § 45-1616.

45-3-1109. Effect of conversion.

When an association subject to this chapter or a federal association effects a conversion in accordance with this chapter, the corporate existence of the association shall not be interrupted, but the identity of the association shall continue, together with all of the obligations and liabilities of the association, and all of its rights, franchises, and interests in and to every kind of property shall continue without the necessity of a deed or other transfer. Any reference to the association before conversion, contained in writing, whether executed or effective before or after the conversion, shall be deemed a reference also to the association after conversion, if not inconsistent with the other provisions of the writing. No pending action or other judicial or administrative proceeding to which the association is a party shall be abated or discontinued by reason of the conversion, but the same may be prosecuted to final judgment, order, or decree in the same manner as if the conversion had not occurred.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.17; T.C.A., § 45-1617.

45-3-1110. Voluntary liquidation and dissolution.

Approval by Commissioner. With the written approval of the commissioner, an association may voluntarily liquidate and dissolve. The commissioner shall grant approval if, from a written application submitted to the commissioner in the form that the commissioner requires, it appears that:

A resolution proposing a voluntary liquidation and dissolution has been adopted by a majority of the existing members of the board of directors of the association; and

The association is not in an impaired condition and has or will have sufficient liquid assets to pay off all depositors and other creditors immediately.(2) Approval by the commissioner shall be in writing, and notice of approval shall be sent by certified mail to the home office of the association within thirty (30) days after receipt of the application to liquidate and dissolve by the commissioner. If the commissioner disapproves the application within the time specified, the commissioner shall state the commissioner's disapproval and objections in writing and send the same by certified mail to the home office of the association, giving the association an opportunity to make changes and resubmit the application so as to obviate the objections. In the event that the commissioner disapproves the liquidation and dissolution after the resubmission, the commissioner shall send written notice of the final disapproval by certified mail to the home office of the association. Failure to send notice of approval or disapproval within the time specified shall be deemed to constitute approval of the voluntary liquidation and dissolution by the commissioner.

Submission to Stockholders or Members. In the event the commissioner does approve the liquidation and dissolution, it shall be submitted to an annual or special meeting of stockholders or members. The liquidation and dissolution shall be adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote, in person or by proxy, of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the outstanding voting stock or votes of members. A certified report of the proceedings of the meeting shall be filed promptly with the commissioner.

Cessation of Business.

Upon approval by the commissioner and adoption by the stockholders or members, the association shall forthwith cease to do business, shall have only the powers necessary to effect an orderly liquidation and shall proceed to pay its depositors and creditors and stockholders or members and to wind up its affairs; and

Within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice of approval, the association shall send a notice of liquidation by mail to each depositor, other creditor, person interested in funds held as a fiduciary, stockholder or member or other interested person. The notice shall be posted conspicuously on the premises of the association and shall be given publication that the commissioner may require. The association shall send with the notice a statement of the amount on its books shown to be the claim of the depositor or other creditor. The notice shall demand that the property held by the association as bailee be withdrawn by the person entitled thereto and that claims of depositors and other creditors, if the amount claimed differs from that stated in the notice to be due, be filed with the association before a specified date not earlier than sixty (60) days thereafter in accordance with the procedure prescribed in the notice.

Claims of Depositors and Other Creditors. The approval of an application for liquidation and dissolution shall not impair any right of a depositor, or other creditor to payment in full, and all lawful claims of depositors and other creditors shall promptly be paid.

Distribution of Assets. Any assets remaining after the discharge of all obligations shall be distributed to the stockholders or members in accordance with their respective interests. Distribution shall not be made before:

All claims of depositors and creditors have been paid or, in the case of any disputed claims, the association has transmitted to the commissioner a sum adequate to meet any liability that may be judicially determined; and

Any funds payable to a depositor or creditor or any property held as bailee and unclaimed have been transmitted to the commissioner. Any unclaimed distribution to a stockholder or member or property held as bailee shall be held until ninety (90) days after the final distribution and then transmitted to the commissioner. Any unclaimed property so held by the commissioner shall be treated as property held in the course of dissolution and reported to the treasurer in accordance with title 66, chapter 29, part 1.

Possession by Commissioner. If the commissioner finds, during the course of the liquidation and dissolution, that the assets will be insufficient for the full discharge of all obligations or that completion of the liquidation has been unduly delayed, the commissioner may take possession and complete the liquidation in the manner provided in this chapter.

Reports; Final Order. The commissioner may require reports of the progress of liquidation, and whenever the commissioner is satisfied that the liquidation has been properly completed, the commissioner shall cancel the certificate of authority and the charter and enter an order of dissolution.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 4.18; T.C.A., § 45-1618; Acts 1983, ch. 78, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, §§ 16-18.